Mississippi, session 2026, SB2721.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 89-10-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 89-10-5.  (1) * * *  Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, any squatter who commits trespass or otherwise enters or remains on another person's property for a short period of time without the authority or consent of the owner or without the authority or consent of a person designated by the owner, shall not accrue any property rights based on the trespass or unauthorized entrance. (2) The right to manage, control or receive payments for any use of real property shall only belong to the owner of the property or a person designated by the owner for such purposes. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.